src/fst/morphology/phonology.xfscript
echo <<< Define vowels >>> 

define Vow [a|e|i|o|ä|u] ;

echo <<< And then the rules ... >>>> 

define ai ä -> i ||  _ h ;

echo <<< h rules >>>

define h1 h -> 0 ||  _ [ä|a] .#.  ;
define h3 h -> 0 || ä _  ;
define ht h -> t ||  _ o ;

echo <<< Now for some X rules >>>

define X1 ä -> 0 || .#. X _ ;
define X2 X -> 0 ||  _ Vow ;
define X3 X -> 0 || Vow _  ;

echo <<< Vowel change rules >>>

define iy i -> y || Vow _  ;
define uw u -> w || Vow _  ;
define ow o -> w || Vow _  ;
define a1 ä -> a ||  _ ä ;
define a2 ä -> 0 ||  _ a ;
define a3 ä -> 0 || a _  ;
define a4 a -> 0 || a _  ;

echo s, t, l, such things

define ss s e -> š || _ .#. ;
define tc t -> č ||  _ e .#.  ;
define ll l -> y  ||  _ e .#.  ;
define nn n -> ñ ||  _ e .#.  ;
define zz z -> ž ||  _ e .#.  ;
define dd d -> ǧ ||  _ e .#.  ;


echo <<< Now we compile >>> 

read regex [
    ai
.o. h1
.o. h3
.o. ht
.o. X1
.o. X2
.o. X3
.o. iy
.o. uw
.o. ow
.o. a1
.o. a2
.o. a3
.o. a4
.o. ss
.o. tc
.o. ll
.o. nn
.o. zz
.o. dd] ;
